Illinois, session 104th, SB3179.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Abused and Neglected Long Term Care 5Facility Residents Reporting Act is amended by changing 6Section 3 as follows: 7    (210 ILCS 30/3)  (from Ch. 111 1/2, par. 4163)8    Sec. 3. As used in this Act unless the context otherwise 9requires:10    a. "Department" means the Department of Public Health of 11the State of Illinois.12    b. "Resident" means a person residing in and receiving 13personal care from a long term care facility, or residing in a 14mental health facility or developmental disability facility as 15defined in the Mental Health and Developmental Disabilities 16Code.17    c. "Long term care facility" has the same meaning ascribed 18to such term in the Nursing Home Care Act, except that the term 19as used in this Act shall include any mental health facility or 20developmental disability facility as defined in the Mental 21Health and Developmental Disabilities Code. The term also 22includes any facility licensed under the Assisted Living and 23Shared Housing Act, the ID/DD Community Care Act, the MC/DD   SB3179- 2 -LRB104 18277 BAB 31717 b1Act, or the Specialized Mental Health Rehabilitation Act of 22013. 3    d. "Abuse" means any physical injury, sexual abuse or 4mental injury inflicted on a resident other than by accidental 5means.6    e. "Neglect" means a failure in a long term care facility 7to provide adequate medical or personal care or maintenance, 8which failure results in physical or mental injury to a 9resident or in the deterioration of a resident's physical or 10mental condition.11    f. "Protective services" means services provided to a 12resident who has been abused or neglected, which may include, 13but are not limited to alternative temporary institutional 14placement, nursing care, counseling, other social services 15provided at the nursing home where the resident resides or at 16some other facility, personal care and such protective 17services of voluntary agencies as are available.18    g. Unless the context otherwise requires, direct or 19indirect references in this Act to the programs, personnel, 20facilities, services, service providers, or service recipients 21of the Department of Human Services shall be construed to 22refer only to those programs, personnel, facilities, services, 23service providers, or service recipients that pertain to the 24Department of Human Services' mental health and developmental 25disabilities functions.26(Source: P.A. 98-104, eff. 7-22-13; 99-180, eff. 7-29-15.)   SB3179- 3 -LRB104 18277 BAB 31717 b1    Section 10. The Adult Protective Services Act is amended 2by changing Section 2 as follows: 3    (320 ILCS 20/2)  (from Ch. 23, par. 6602)4    Sec. 2. Definitions. As used in this Act, unless the 5context requires otherwise:6    (a) "Abandonment" means the desertion or willful forsaking 7of an eligible adult by an individual responsible for the care 8and custody of that eligible adult under circumstances in 9which a reasonable person would continue to provide care and 10custody. Nothing in this Act shall be construed to mean that an 11eligible adult is a victim of abandonment because of health 12care services provided or not provided by licensed health care 13professionals. 14    (a-1) "Abuse" means causing any physical, mental or sexual 15injury to an eligible adult, including exploitation of such 16adult's financial resources, and abandonment or subjecting an 17eligible adult to an environment which creates a likelihood of 18harm to the eligible adult's health, physical and emotional 19well-being, or welfare.20    Nothing in this Act shall be construed to mean that an 21eligible adult is a victim of abuse, abandonment, neglect, or 22self-neglect for the sole reason that he or she is being 23furnished with or relies upon treatment by spiritual means 24through prayer alone, in accordance with the tenets and   SB3179- 4 -LRB104 18277 BAB 31717 b1practices of a recognized church or religious denomination.2    Nothing in this Act shall be construed to mean that an 3eligible adult is a victim of abuse because of health care 4services provided or not provided by licensed health care 5professionals.6    Nothing in this Act shall be construed to mean that an 7eligible adult is a victim of abuse in cases of criminal 8activity by strangers, telemarketing scams, consumer fraud, 9internet fraud, home repair disputes, complaints against a 10homeowners' association, or complaints between landlords and 11tenants. 12    (a-5) "Abuser" means a person who is a family member, 13caregiver, or another person who has a continuing relationship 14with the eligible adult and abuses, abandons, neglects, or 15financially exploits an eligible adult.16    (a-6) "Adult with disabilities" means a person aged 18 17through 59 who resides in a domestic living situation and 18whose disability as defined in subsection (c-5) impairs his or 19her ability to seek or obtain protection from abuse, 20abandonment, neglect, or exploitation. 21    (a-7) "Caregiver" means a person who either as a result of 22a family relationship, voluntarily, or in exchange for 23compensation has assumed responsibility for all or a portion 24of the care of an eligible adult who needs assistance with 25activities of daily living or instrumental activities of daily 26living.  SB3179- 5 -LRB104 18277 BAB 31717 b1    (b) "Department" means the Department on Aging of the 2State of Illinois.3    (c) "Director" means the Director of the Department.4    (c-5) "Disability" means a physical or mental disability, 5including, but not limited to, a developmental disability, an 6intellectual disability, a mental illness as defined under the 7Mental Health and Developmental Disabilities Code, or dementia 8as defined under the Alzheimer's Disease Assistance Act. 9    (d) "Domestic living situation" means a residence where 10the eligible adult at the time of the report lives alone or 11with his or her family or a caregiver, or others, or other 12community-based unlicensed facility, but is not:13        (1) A licensed facility as defined in Section 1-113 of 14    the Nursing Home Care Act;15        (1.5) A facility licensed under the ID/DD Community 16    Care Act; 17        (1.6) A facility licensed under the MC/DD Act; 18        (1.7) A facility licensed under the Specialized Mental 19    Health Rehabilitation Act of 2013; 20        (2) A "life care facility" as defined in the Life Care 21    Facilities Act;22        (3) A home, institution, or other place operated by 23    the federal government or agency thereof or by the State 24    of Illinois;25        (4) A hospital, sanitarium, or other institution, the 26    principal activity or business of which is the diagnosis,   SB3179- 6 -LRB104 18277 BAB 31717 b1    care, and treatment of human illness through the 2    maintenance and operation of organized facilities 3    therefor, which is required to be licensed under the 4    Hospital Licensing Act;5        (5) A "community living facility" as defined in the 6    Community Living Facilities Licensing Act;7        (6) (Blank);8        (7) A "community-integrated living arrangement" as 9    defined in the Community-Integrated Living Arrangements 10    Licensure and Certification Act or a "community 11    residential alternative" as licensed under that Act; or 12        (8) An assisted living or shared housing establishment 13    as defined in the Assisted Living and Shared Housing Act. 14    ; or 15        (9) A supportive living facility as described in 16    Section 5-5.01a of the Illinois Public Aid Code. 17    (e) "Eligible adult" means either an adult with 18disabilities aged 18 through 59 or a person aged 60 or older 19who resides in a domestic living situation and is, or is 20alleged to be, abused, abandoned, neglected, or financially 21exploited by another individual or who neglects himself or 22herself. "Eligible adult" also includes an adult who resides 23in any of the facilities that are excluded from the definition 24of "domestic living situation" under paragraphs (1) through 25(9) of subsection (d), if either: (i) the alleged abuse, 26abandonment, or neglect occurs outside of the facility and not   SB3179- 7 -LRB104 18277 BAB 31717 b1under facility supervision and the alleged abuser is a family 2member, caregiver, or another person who has a continuing 3relationship with the adult; or (ii) the alleged financial 4exploitation is perpetrated by a family member, caregiver, or 5another person who has a continuing relationship with the 6adult, but who is not an employee of the facility where the 7adult resides.8    (f) "Emergency" means a situation in which an eligible 9adult is living in conditions presenting a risk of death or 10physical, mental or sexual injury and the provider agency has 11reason to believe the eligible adult is unable to consent to 12services which would alleviate that risk.13    (f-1) "Financial exploitation" means the use of an 14eligible adult's resources by another to the disadvantage of 15that adult or the profit or advantage of a person other than 16that adult. 17    (f-3) "Investment advisor" means any person required to 18register as an investment adviser or investment adviser 19representative under Section 8 of the Illinois Securities Law 20of 1953, which for purposes of this Act excludes any bank, 21trust company, savings bank, or credit union, or their 22respective employees. 23    (f-5) "Mandated reporter" means any of the following 24persons while engaged in carrying out their professional 25duties:26        (1) a professional or professional's delegate while   SB3179- 8 -LRB104 18277 BAB 31717 b1    engaged in: (i) social services, (ii) law enforcement, 2    (iii) education, (iv) the care of an eligible adult or 3    eligible adults, or (v) any of the occupations required to 4    be licensed under the Behavior Analyst Licensing Act, the 5    Clinical Psychologist Licensing Act, the Clinical Social 6    Work and Social Work Practice Act, the Illinois Dental 7    Practice Act, the Dietitian Nutritionist Practice Act, the 8    Marriage and Family Therapy Licensing Act, the Medical 9    Practice Act of 1987, the Naprapathic Practice Act, the 10    Nurse Practice Act, the Nursing Home Administrators 11    Licensing and Disciplinary Act, the Illinois Occupational 12    Therapy Practice Act, the Illinois Optometric Practice Act 13    of 1987, the Pharmacy Practice Act, the Illinois Physical 14    Therapy Act, the Physician Assistant Practice Act of 1987, 15    the Podiatric Medical Practice Act of 1987, the 16    Respiratory Care Practice Act, the Professional Counselor 17    and Clinical Professional Counselor Licensing and Practice 18    Act, the Illinois Speech-Language Pathology and Audiology 19    Practice Act, the Veterinary Medicine and Surgery Practice 20    Act of 2004, and the Illinois Public Accounting Act;21        (1.5) an employee of an entity providing developmental 22    disabilities services or service coordination funded by 23    the Department of Human Services; 24        (2) an employee of a vocational rehabilitation 25    facility prescribed or supervised by the Department of 26    Human Services;  SB3179- 9 -LRB104 18277 BAB 31717 b1        (3) an administrator, employee, or person providing 2    services in or through an unlicensed community based 3    facility;4        (4) any religious practitioner who provides treatment 5    by prayer or spiritual means alone in accordance with the 6    tenets and practices of a recognized church or religious 7    denomination, except as to information received in any 8    confession or sacred communication enjoined by the 9    discipline of the religious denomination to be held 10    confidential;11        (5) field personnel of the Department of Healthcare 12    and Family Services, Department of Public Health, and 13    Department of Human Services, and any county or municipal 14    health department;15        (6) personnel of the Department of Human Services, the 16    Guardianship and Advocacy Commission, the State Fire 17    Marshal, local fire departments, the Department on Aging 18    and its subsidiary Area Agencies on Aging and provider 19    agencies, except the State Long Term Care Ombudsman and 20    any of his or her representatives or volunteers where 21    prohibited from making such a report pursuant to 45 CFR 22    1324.11(e)(3)(iv);23        (7) any employee of the State of Illinois not 24    otherwise specified herein who is involved in providing 25    services to eligible adults, including professionals 26    providing medical or rehabilitation services and all other   SB3179- 10 -LRB104 18277 BAB 31717 b1    persons having direct contact with eligible adults;2        (8) a person who performs the duties of a coroner or 3    medical examiner;4        (9) a person who performs the duties of a paramedic or 5    an emergency medical technician; or6        (10) a person who performs the duties of an investment 7    advisor. 8    (g) "Neglect" means another individual's failure to 9provide an eligible adult with or willful withholding from an 10eligible adult the necessities of life including, but not 11limited to, food, clothing, shelter or health care. This 12subsection does not create any new affirmative duty to provide 13support to eligible adults. Nothing in this Act shall be 14construed to mean that an eligible adult is a victim of neglect 15because of health care services provided or not provided by 16licensed health care professionals.17    (h) "Provider agency" means any public or nonprofit agency 18in a planning and service area that is selected by the 19Department or appointed by the regional administrative agency 20with prior approval by the Department on Aging to receive and 21assess reports of alleged or suspected abuse, abandonment, 22neglect, or financial exploitation. A provider agency is also 23referenced as a "designated agency" in this Act. 24    (i) "Regional administrative agency" means any public or 25nonprofit agency in a planning and service area that provides 26regional oversight and performs functions as set forth in   SB3179- 11 -LRB104 18277 BAB 31717 b1subsection (b) of Section 3 of this Act. The Department shall 2designate an Area Agency on Aging as the regional 3administrative agency or, in the event the Area Agency on 4Aging in that planning and service area is deemed by the 5Department to be unwilling or unable to provide those 6functions, the Department may serve as the regional 7administrative agency or designate another qualified entity to 8serve as the regional administrative agency; any such 9designation shall be subject to terms set forth by the 10Department.11    (i-5) "Self-neglect" means a condition that is the result 12of an eligible adult's inability, due to physical or mental 13impairments, or both, or a diminished capacity, to perform 14essential self-care tasks that substantially threaten his or 15her own health, including: providing essential food, clothing, 16shelter, and health care; and obtaining goods and services 17necessary to maintain physical health, mental health, 18emotional well-being, and general safety. The term includes 19compulsive hoarding, which is characterized by the acquisition 20and retention of large quantities of items and materials that 21produce an extensively cluttered living space, which 22significantly impairs the performance of essential self-care 23tasks or otherwise substantially threatens life or safety. 24    (j) "Substantiated case" means a reported case of alleged 25or suspected abuse, abandonment, neglect, financial 26exploitation, or self-neglect in which a provider agency,   SB3179- 12 -LRB104 18277 BAB 31717 b1after assessment, determines that there is reason to believe 2abuse, abandonment, neglect, or financial exploitation has 3occurred.4    (k) "Verified" means a determination that there is "clear 5and convincing evidence" that the specific injury or harm 6alleged was the result of abuse, abandonment, neglect, or 7financial exploitation. 8(Source: P.A. 102-244, eff. 1-1-22; 102-953, eff. 5-27-22; 9103-329, eff. 1-1-24; 103-626, eff. 1-1-25.)